apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="géni/us__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>us</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ové</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ů</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ům</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ové</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ech</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>em</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dinosau/rus__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rus</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ři</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rové</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rů</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ru</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rovi</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rům</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ři</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rové</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ru</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rovi</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rech</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rem</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e c="FIXME - guess">
      <p>
        <l>ří</l>
        <r>rus<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bláz/en__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eni</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>na</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nů</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>novi</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nům</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>na</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ny</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ne</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>novi</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nech</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nem</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eny</l>
        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kol/o__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ům</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ech</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>em</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="alamosaurus"><i>alamosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="allosaurus"><i>allosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ankylosaurus"><i>ankylosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="archosaurus"><i>archosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blázen"><i>bláz</i><par n="bláz/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brachiosaurus"><i>brachiosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="branchiosaurus"><i>branchiosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brontosaurus"><i>brontosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carnosaurus"><i>carnosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centrosaurus"><i>centrosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceratosaurus"><i>ceratosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chasmosaurus"><i>chasmosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coelurosaurus"><i>coelurosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cotylosaurus"><i>cotylosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="coelurosaurus"><p><l>célurosau</l><r>coelurosau</r></p><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daspletosaurus"><i>daspletosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deinonychosaurus"><i>deinonychosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dinosaurus"><i>dinosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dromaeosaurus"><i>dromaeosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="edaphosaurus"><p><l>edafosau</l><r>edaphosau</r></p><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="edaphosaurus"><i>edaphosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="euro"><i>eur</i><par n="kol/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eurhinosaurus"><i>eurhinosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gigantosaurus"><i>gigantosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="génius"><i>géni</i><par n="géni/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hadrosaurus"><i>hadrosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ichtyosaurus"><i>ichtyosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jaro"><i>jar</i><par n="kol/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jezero"><i>jezer</i><par n="kol/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolo"><i>kol</i><par n="kol/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="léčivo"><i>léčiv</i><par n="kol/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maso"><i>mas</i><par n="kol/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mastodonsaurus"><i>mastodonsau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="megalosaurus"><i>megalosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesosaurus"><i>mesosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mosasaurus"><i>mosasau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pareiasaurus"><i>pareiasau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pelycosaurus"><i>pelycosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pivo"><i>piv</i><par n="kol/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plesiosaurus"><i>plesiosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pliosaurus"><i>pliosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pterosaurus"><i>pterosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stegosaurus"><i>stegosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styracosaurus"><i>styracosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="styracosaurus"><p><l>styrakosau</l><r>styracosau</r></p><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyranosaurus"><i>tyranosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tělo"><i>těl</i><par n="kol/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="varanosaurus"><i>varanosau</i><par n="dinosau/rus__n"/></e>
